New York, session 2025-2026, A1329.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 6 of section 400 of the general business law, 2 as added by chapter 509 of the laws of 1992, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 6. The practice of "esthetics" means providing for a fee, or any 5 consideration or exchange, whether direct or indirect, services to 6 enhance the appearance of the face, neck, arms, legs, and shoulders of a 7 human being by the use of compounds or procedures including makeup, 8 eyelashes, depilatories, tonics, lotions, waxes, sanding [and], tweezing 9 and eyebrow threading, whether performed by manual, mechanical, chemical 10 or electrical means and instruments but shall not include the practice 11 of electrology. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 13 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or 14 repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of 15 this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and completed 16 on or before such date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03842-01-5